tests/runtime/externals.sbl
// Test calling externals within the program.

externals (stem e1 e2)

define stem as (
  not e2 or fail='failed to call external e2'

  test e1 or fail='external as among function failed'
  $(len == 4) or fail='external as among function result wrong'
  not e1 or fail='external as among function did not fail'

  ='ok'
)

define e1 as (
  [substring] among (
    'ok' e2 ( <-'oops' )
    'no' ( <-'nope' )
  )
)

define e2 as atlimit
